Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-109
Chairs of instruction; faculty; duties in more than one college.

The Board of Regents shall be empowered to establish in these several colleges such chairs of instruction as may be proper, and so many of them as the funds of the university may allow. It is also authorized to require professors to perform duties in more than one of the several colleges whenever the board shall deem it wise and proper so to do.

Laws 1869, § 9, p. 175;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 57;

R.S.1913, § 7087;

C.S.1922, § 6719;

C.S.1929, § 85-107;

R.S.1943, § 85-109.